Massachusetts, session 194th, H4053.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 2J the 
following section:- 
Section 2K. (a) For the purposes of the section, a “kei car” or “kei truck” shall mean 
every motor vehicle of the keijidosha class of imported vehicles including, but not limited to, 
mini-trucks, microvans and kei cars imported pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 30112(b)(9) having 4 
wheels, an engine displacement of 660 cubic centimeters or less, an overall length of 130 inches 
or less, an overall height of 78 inches or less and an overall width of 60 inches or less. 
(b) The registrar may accept applications for registration or renewal of registration for kei 
cars or kei trucks pursuant to section 2.